Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLI Laws
Determination of Death

446.400.
Determination
of death — Minimal conditions to be met.

For all legal purposes, the
occurrence of human death shall be determined in accordance with the usual
and customary standards of medical practice, provided that death shall not
be determined to have occurred unless the following minimal conditions have
been met:

When respiration and circulation are not artificially maintained, there is an irreversible cessation of spontaneous respiration and circulation; or

When respiration and circulation are artificially maintained, and there is a total and irreversible cessation of all brain function, including the brain stem and that such determination is made by two (2) licensed physicians.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.